Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska20-137
Religious preference; not violation of discriminatory practice.

Any place of public accommodation owned by or operated on behalf of a religious corporation, association, or society which gives preference in the use of such place to members of the same faith as that of the administering body shall not be guilty of discriminatory practice.

Laws 1973, LB 112, § 6.